North Carolina, session 2025, HB494.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new Article
to read:
"Article 1O.
"Mental Health Protection Act.
"§ 90-21.160. Short title.
This Article shall be known as the "Mental Health Protection Act."
"§ 90-21.161. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Adult who has a disability. – A "disabled adult" as defined in
G.S. 108A-101(d).
(2) Conversion therapy. – Any practices or treatments that seek to change an
individual's sexual orientation or gender identity, including efforts to (i)
change behaviors and gender expressions or (ii) eliminate or reduce sexual or
romantic attractions or feelings toward individuals of the same gender.
Conversion therapy shall not include counseling that provides assistance to an
individual undergoing gender transition or counseling that provides
acceptance, support, and understanding of an individual or facilitates an
individual's coping, social support, and identity exploration and development,
including sexual-orientation-neutral interventions to prevent or address
unlawful conduct or unsafe sexual practices, as long as such counseling does
not seek to change an individual's sexual orientation or gender identity.
"§ 90-21.162. Conversion therapy prohibited.
(a) The following professionals shall not engage in conversion therapy with an individual
under 18 years of age or an adult who has a disability:
(1) Fee-based practicing pastoral counselor as defined in G.S. 90-382.
(2) Licensed clinical social worker as defined in G.S. 90B-3.
(3) Licensed marriage and family therapist as defined in G.S. 90-270.47.
(4) Licensed professional counselor as defined in G.S. 90-330.
(5) Psychiatrist licensed in accordance with Article 1 of this Chapter.
(6) Psychologist as defined in G.S. 90-270.2.
(b) Conversion therapy practiced by any licensed professional in subsection (a) of this
section shall be considered unprofessional conduct and shall subject each licensed professional
who engages in the practice of conversion therapy to discipline under the licensed professional's
respective licensing entity.
(c) The Department of Health and Human Services shall have concurrent authority to
initiate proceedings for violations of this section. The Department shall promulgate rules in
accordance with this section.
"§ 90-21.163. Prohibited State funding.
Page 4 House Bill 494-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
No State funds, nor any funds belonging to a municipality, agency, or political subdivision
of this State, shall be expended for the purpose of conducting conversion therapy, referring an
individual for conversion therapy, health benefits coverage for conversion therapy, or a grant or
contract with any entity that conducts conversion therapy or refers individuals for conversion
therapy."
SECTION 2. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect
without the invalid provisions or application and, to this end, the provisions of this act are
severable.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to acts on or after
that date.
House Bill 494-First Edition Page 5